Georgia, session 2025_26, HB785.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
(a) The clerk of the Probate Court of Crawford County is hereby authorized to charge and
collect a technology fee to be set by the judge of the probate court in an amount not to
exceed $5.00 for the filing of each civil action with the court and not to exceed $5.00 as a
surcharge upon each fine assessed by the court. Such technology fees shall be used
exclusively to provide for technological needs of the Probate Court of Crawford County.
Such uses shall include only the following:
(1) Computer hardware, software, and accessory purchases;
(2) Lease, maintenance, and installation of computer hardware;
(3) Purchase, lease, maintenance, and installation of imaging, scanning, facsimile,
communications, projection, and printing equipment and software; and
H. B. 785
- 1 -

LC 47 3555/AP
(4) Procurement of services or equipment for the conversion of court records and
archives to digital content for public access.
(b) Funds collected pursuant to this section shall be maintained in a segregated account by
the clerk of the probate court and shall be used only for the purposes authorized in this
section.
(c) The authority to assess the technology fee pursuant to this Act shall terminate on
July 1, 2035, and any residual funds remaining in the account established by subsection (b)
of this section shall remain dedicated to general Crawford County technology uses.
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 785
- 2 -